Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB790.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 906. Vexatious requesters.(a) Petition for relief.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), an agency may petition the Office of Open Records for relief from a requester alleged by the agency to be a vexatious requester. The petition shall:(i) be submitted under penalty of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 12345678910111213141516171819202122 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities);(ii) be served on the Office of Open Records and the requester alleged to be a vexatious requester; and(iii) demonstrate, by clear and convincing evidence, that the alleged vexatious requester's request or requests, considered collectively, constitute vexatious conduct. For the purpose of this subparagraph, relevant factors may include any of the following:(A) The number of requests filed.(B) The number of pending requests.(C) The scope and complexity of the requests.(D) The nature, content, language or subject matter of the requests.(E) The nature, content, language or subject matter of other communications with the agency.(F) Conduct alleged to impose an unreasonable burden on the agency.(G) Conduct, including communications in writing or otherwise documented, expressing intent to harass, annoy, frustrate or burden an agency.(H) Evidence of repetitive requests for identical or substantially similar records previously provided or denied with finality.(I) Other relevant evidence of vexatious intent.(2) An agency may not petition for relief under paragraph (1) if the alleged vexatious requester: (i) is a parent or guardian of a student enrolled in a school within a school entity and the request relates directly to the school entity's educational curriculum or policies;20250SB0790PN0845 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) is a candidate, or is designated by a candidate or political party, and the request pertains to voter registration or election administration; or(iii) was previously subject to a petition under paragraph (1) by the same agency, and the petition was denied under subsection (f)(1) or (2) within the previous calendar year.(3) A petition for relief under paragraph (1) may include a request for a stay, which shall demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that a stay is necessary because:(i) the number and frequency of requests demonstrably exceed the agency's reasonable capacity to respond without significant disruption to the agency's core functions; or(ii) the requester has demonstrated clear intent to harass, annoy, frustrate or burden an agency.(b) Processing of petitions.-- Upon receipt of a petition under subsection (a)(1), the executive director of the Office of Open Records or a designee shall have the following duties:(1) Within five business days, provide a notice to the alleged vexatious requester in writing that the requester may submit a preliminary response to the petition within 10 business days of receipt of the notification under this paragraph.(2) If the petition contained a request under subsection (a)(3) and the executive director or a designee has determined that a preliminary stay is appropriate, within 15 business days, inform the agency and the alleged vexatious requester that the Office of Open Records has determined that 20250SB0790PN0845 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pending or new requests are stayed pending resolution of the petition. The determination under this paragraph shall not be appealable.(c) Initial determination.-- Within 30 calendar days of receiving a petition under subsection (a)(1), the executive director or a designee shall review the petition and determine whether further proceedings are warranted. The following shall apply:(1) If further proceedings are not warranted, including if the requester meets the criteria specified under subsection (a)(2), the executive director or designee shall deny the petition and provide a notice to the alleged vexatious requester and the agency in writing with a statement of reasons.(2) If further proceedings are warranted, the executive director or a designee shall have the following duties:(i) Establish a briefing schedule to afford the alleged vexatious requester a fair opportunity to respond to the petition.(ii) If the petition contained a request under subsection (a)(3), determine whether pending or new requests from the alleged vexatious requester should be processed or stayed pending resolution of the petition. The determination under this subparagraph shall not be appealable.(iii) If the executive director or a designee determines that a preliminary stay is appropriate under subsection (a)(3), determine whether the stay should be continued or if pending or new requests from the requester should be processed.20250SB0790PN0845 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Hearing.--(1) After reviewing the alleged vexatious requester's response under subsection (c)(2)(i), if any, the executive director or a designee shall determine whether a hearing is necessary and provide notice of the determination to the requester and the agency in writing within five business days. The determination under this paragraph shall not be appealable.( 2) If a hearing is held, the executive director or a designee may:(i) admit testimony, documents or other evidence deemed reasonably probative and relevant; or(ii) exclude or limit evidence deemed cumulative or irrelevant.(e) Mediation.-- At any time during proceedings under this section, the executive director or a designee may propose mediation through the Office of Open Records. If both the alleged vexatious requester and the agency consent, mediation shall proceed for up to 90 calendar days, extendable by mutual agreement. All other proceedings under this section shall be stayed during mediation.(f) Final determination.--(1) Unless otherwise agreed by the agency, the executive director or a designee shall issue a final determination granting or denying the petition under subsection (a)(1) within 90 calendar days of the petition's filing.(2) Subject to paragraph (1), if no final determination is issued within 90 calendar days, the petition shall be deemed denied.(3) If the petition is granted, the executive director 20250SB0790PN0845 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or a designee may order relief proportionate to the vexatious conduct, including limiting the agency's obligation to respond to future requests from the vexatious requester for a period not exceeding one calendar year from the date the petition is granted. Relief under this paragraph shall be narrowly tailored to address the specific conduct and employ the least restrictive means necessary.(4) The executive director or a designee shall post the final determination on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Office of Open Records.(g) Content-neutral application.-- Determinations under this section shall be made in a consistent and content-neutral manner, without regard to the subject matter or political implications of the requests.(h) Appeal.--Notwithstanding section 1309, a party aggrieved by a determination under this section, except for determinations under subsection (b)(2), (c)(2)(ii) or (d)(1), may file a petition for review or other document as might be required by rule of court with Commonwealth Court within 15 calendar days of the determination. The decision of the court shall contain findings of fact and conclusions of law based upon the evidence as a whole. The decision shall clearly and concisely explain the rationale for the decision.(i) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Executive director." The executive director of the Office of Open Records."Vexatious." C onduct intended solely to harass, annoy, frustrate or burden an agency.20250SB0790PN0845 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Vexatious request." A request submitted solely for a vexatious purpose. The term does not include a request that causes inconvenience or burden but is submitted for a purpose other than a vexatious purpose."Vexatious requester." An individual who submits one or more vexatious requests.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250SB0790PN0845 - 7 - 1234567